Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0611

Meetings.

(1) A board of directors shall meet at least annually and may hold meetings inside or outside this state.

(2) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a board of directors may permit directors to attend or conduct board meetings through the use of any means of communication, if all directors attending the meeting can communicate with each other during the meeting.

[ 2019 c 37 s 611.]